Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3325
Veterinary technician; license; requirements; temporary license.

(1) To be a licensed veterinary technician in this state, an individual shall (a) be a graduate of an approved veterinary technician program and (b) receive a passing score on a national examination approved by the board.

(2) The department may grant a temporary license to practice as a veterinary technician for up to one year upon application by:

(a) A graduate of an approved veterinary technician program pending passage of the national examination approved by the board; or

(b) A person lawfully authorized to practice as a veterinary technician in another state pending completion of the application for a license under the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act.

Laws 2000, LB 833, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 25;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 57;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,165;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1107;

Laws 2016, LB908, § 1.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.